District of Columbia statutes.
48-710

Suspension, denial, or revocation.

(a)

The Mayor may deny, suspend, or revoke a license, or convert the license to a conditional license, if the Mayor determines that:

(1)

The person has violated a provision of this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, or any other applicable federal or District law; or

(2)

The person fraudulently or deceptively obtained or attempted to obtain a license in violation of this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, or any other applicable federal or District law.

(b)

The Mayor shall revoke any license issued pursuant to this chapter upon conviction of the licensee for a criminal violation of this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, or any applicable federal law.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 11, 37 DCR 2631

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1010.